Indiana, session 2026, SB149.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 9-21-3.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 3.7. Tolling Transponders
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "qualifying account" means an
active electronic toll collection customer account associated with
a certain transponder.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "toll road" has the meaning set
forth in IC 9-21-3.5-7.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "tollway" has the meaning set
forth in IC 9-21-3.5-8.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "transponder" means a device,
placed on or within a motor vehicle, that is capable of transmitting
information used to assess or collect tolls.
Sec. 5. (a) A person with a qualifying account that:
(1) has a permanent residence or a place of employment
located in a county with a toll road or tollway; and
2026 IN 149—LS 6462/DI 137


(2) pays for tolls assessed while traveling on the toll road or
tollway described in subdivision (1) in the person's personal
vehicle through the person's transponder;
may apply for a future credit on the person's transponder in an
amount equal to seventy-five percent (75%) of the amount paid for
tolls since the person's last application for a future credit under
this subsection.
(b) A person may apply for a future credit under subsection (a)
not more than once every thirty (30) days.
(c) Not later than December 31, 2026, the bureau shall provide
a method for applying to the bureau for a future credit under
subsection (a) on the bureau's website. The bureau may require a
person to provide proof of residency or proof of employment in a
county with a toll road or a tollway on a periodic basis.
(d) The bureau must provide the person administering the
qualified account with the amount of the credit not later than ten
(10) days after an application is approved. The person
administering the qualified account must load the credit on to the
qualified account not later than ten (10) days after the bureau
provides the person with the amount of the credit.
(e) The state comptroller shall make payments to an operator
(as defined in IC 9-21-3.5-4) from the state general fund at least
once every ninety (90) days in the amount of those credits used by
qualified accounts to pay for tolls that would have been paid to the
operator.
Sec. 6. A person who uses a transponder that is not registered
under a qualifying account owned by:
(1) the person;
(2) the person's employer;
(3) a car rental company that owns the car being driven by
the person; or
(4) another person with the same permanent residence as the
person;
to pay for a toll or user fee while traveling on a toll road or tollway
commits a Class B misdemeanor.
Sec. 7. All information collected by a transponder and regarding
a qualifying account is confidential and not subject to disclosure
under IC 5-14-3.
SECTION 2. IC 35-52-9.1-12.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12.8. IC 9-21-3.7-6 defines a
crime concerning traffic regulation.
2026 IN 149—LS 6462/DI 137